app/polish.aff
        Y W A Æ                 >       -YWAÆ,UJ¡CYMI
        Y W A Æ                 >       -YWAÆ,UJ¡CYCH
        Y W A Æ                 >       -YWAÆ,UJ¡CEGO
        Y W A Æ                 >       -YWAÆ,UJ¡CEMU
        Y W A Æ                 >       -YWAÆ,UJ¡CA
        Y W A Æ                 >       -YWAÆ,UJ¡C¡
        Y W A Æ                 >       -YWAÆ,UJ¡CE
        Y W A Æ                 >       -YWAÆ,UJ¡CEJ

        [^CDR] Z A Æ            >       -ZAÆ,¯¡CY
        [^CDR] Z A Æ            >       -ZAÆ,¯¡CYM
        [^CDR] Z A Æ            >       -ZAÆ,¯¡CYMI
        [^CDR] Z A Æ            >       -ZAÆ,¯¡CYCH
        [^CDR] Z A Æ            >       -ZAÆ,¯¡CEGO
        [^CDR] Z A Æ            >       -ZAÆ,¯¡CEMU
        [^CDR] Z A Æ            >       -ZAÆ,¯¡CA
        [^CDR] Z A Æ            >       -ZAÆ,¯¡C¡
        [^CDR] Z A Æ            >       -ZAÆ,¯¡CE
        [^CDR] Z A Æ            >       -ZAÆ,¯¡CEJ

        R Z A Æ                 >       -AÆ,EJ¡CY
        R Z A Æ                 >       -AÆ,EJ¡CYM
        R Z A Æ                 >       -AÆ,EJ¡CYMI
        R Z A Æ                 >       -AÆ,EJ¡CYCH
        R Z A Æ                 >       -AÆ,EJ¡CEGO
        R Z A Æ                 >       -AÆ,EJ¡CEMU
        R Z A Æ                 >       -AÆ,EJ¡CA
        R Z A Æ                 >       -AÆ,EJ¡C¡
        R Z A Æ                 >       -AÆ,EJ¡CE
        R Z A Æ                 >       -AÆ,EJ¡CEJ

#gi±æ
        G I ¡ Æ                 >       -I¡Æ,N¡CY
        G I ¡ Æ                 >       -I¡Æ,N¡CYM
        G I ¡ Æ                 >       -I¡Æ,N¡CYMI
        G I ¡ Æ                 >       -I¡Æ,N¡CYCH
        G I ¡ Æ                 >       -I¡Æ,N¡CEGO
        G I ¡ Æ                 >       -I¡Æ,N¡CEMU
        G I ¡ Æ                 >       -I¡Æ,N¡CA
        G I ¡ Æ                 >       -I¡Æ,N¡C¡
        G I ¡ Æ                 >       -I¡Æ,N¡CE
        G I ¡ Æ                 >       -I¡Æ,N¡CEJ

#kl±æ
        L ¡ Æ                   >       -¡Æ,N¡CY
        L ¡ Æ                   >       -¡Æ,N¡CYM
        L ¡ Æ                   >       -¡Æ,N¡CYMI
        L ¡ Æ                   >       -¡Æ,N¡CYCH
        L ¡ Æ                   >       -¡Æ,N¡CEGO
        L ¡ Æ                   >       -¡Æ,N¡CEMU
        L ¡ Æ                   >       -¡Æ,N¡CA
        L ¡ Æ                   >       -¡Æ,N¡C¡
        L ¡ Æ                   >       -¡Æ,N¡CE
        L ¡ Æ                   >       -¡Æ,N¡CEJ

        S N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CY
        S N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CYM
        S N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CYMI
        S N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CYCH
        S N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CEGO
        S N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CEMU
        S N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CA
        S N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,C¡
        S N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CE
        S N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CEJ

        Z N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CY
        Z N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CYM
        Z N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CYMI
        Z N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CYCH
        Z N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CEGO
        Z N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CEMU
        Z N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CA
        Z N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,C¡
        Z N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CE
        Z N ¡ Æ                 >       -Æ,CEJ

        D Z I E Æ               >       -IEÆ,¡CY
        D Z I E Æ               >       -IEÆ,¡CYM
        D Z I E Æ               >       -IEÆ,¡CYMI
        D Z I E Æ               >       -IEÆ,¡CYCH
        D Z I E Æ               >       -IEÆ,¡CEGO
        D Z I E Æ               >       -IEÆ,¡CEMU
        D Z I E Æ               >       -IEÆ,¡CA
        D Z I E Æ               >       -IEÆ,¡C¡
        D Z I E Æ               >       -IEÆ,¡CE
        D Z I E Æ               >       -IEÆ,¡CEJ

# lecieæ
        C I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CY
        C I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CYM
        C I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CYMI
        C I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CYCH
        C I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CEGO
        C I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CEMU
        C I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CA
        C I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡C¡
        C I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CE
        C I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CEJ

        N I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CY
        N I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CYM
        N I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CYMI
        N I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CYCH
        N I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CEGO
        N I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CEMU
        N I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CA
        N I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡C¡
        N I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CE
        N I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,¡CEJ

        [MP] I E Æ              >       -EÆ,¡CY
        [MP] I E Æ              >       -EÆ,¡CYM
        [MP] I E Æ              >       -EÆ,¡CYMI
        [MP] I E Æ              >       -EÆ,¡CYCH
        [MP] I E Æ              >       -EÆ,¡CEGO
        [MP] I E Æ              >       -EÆ,¡CEMU
        [MP] I E Æ              >       -EÆ,¡CA
        [MP] I E Æ              >       -EÆ,¡C¡
        [MP] I E Æ              >       -EÆ,¡CE
        [MP] I E Æ              >       -EÆ,¡CEJ

        S I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,Z¡CY
        S I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,Z¡CYM
        S I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,Z¡CYMI
        S I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,Z¡CYCH
        S I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,Z¡CEGO
        S I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,Z¡CEMU
        S I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,Z¡CA
        S I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,Z¡C¡
        S I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,Z¡CE
        S I E Æ                 >       -IEÆ,Z¡CEJ

        L E Æ                   >       -EÆ,¡CY
        L E Æ                   >       -EÆ,¡CYM
        L E Æ                   >       -EÆ,¡CYMI
        L E Æ                   >       -EÆ,¡CYCH
        L E Æ                   >       -EÆ,¡CEGO
        L E Æ                   >       -EÆ,¡CEMU
        L E Æ                   >       -EÆ,¡CA
        L E Æ                   >       -EÆ,¡C¡
        L E Æ                   >       -EÆ,¡CE
        L E Æ                   >       -EÆ,¡CEJ

	[AO] R Z E Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CY
	[AO] R Z E Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CYM
	[AO] R Z E Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CYMI
	[AO] R Z E Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CYCH
	[AO] R Z E Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CEGO
	[AO] R Z E Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CEMU
	[AO] R Z E Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CA
	[AO] R Z E Æ            >       -Æ,J¡C¡
	[AO] R Z E Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CE
	[AO] R Z E Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CEJ

        [^AO] R Z E Æ           >       -ZEÆ,¡CY
        [^AO] R Z E Æ           >       -ZEÆ,¡CYM
        [^AO] R Z E Æ           >       -ZEÆ,¡CYMI
        [^AO] R Z E Æ           >       -ZEÆ,¡CYCH
        [^AO] R Z E Æ           >       -ZEÆ,¡CEGO
        [^AO] R Z E Æ           >       -ZEÆ,¡CEMU
        [^AO] R Z E Æ           >       -ZEÆ,¡CA
        [^AO] R Z E Æ           >       -ZEÆ,¡C¡
        [^AO] R Z E Æ           >       -ZEÆ,¡CE
        [^AO] R Z E Æ           >       -ZEÆ,¡CEJ

        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CY
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CYM
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CYMI
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CYCH
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CEGO
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CEMU
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CA
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,J¡C¡
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CE
        [BFMNPW] I Æ            >       -Æ,J¡CEJ

# trz±¶æ
        ¡ ¦ Æ                   >       -¡¦Æ,ÊS¡CY
        ¡ ¦ Æ                   >       -¡¦Æ,ÊS¡CYM
        ¡ ¦ Æ                   >       -¡¦Æ,ÊS¡CYMI
        ¡ ¦ Æ                   >       -¡¦Æ,ÊS¡CYCH
        ¡ ¦ Æ                   >       -¡¦Æ,ÊS¡CEGO
        ¡ ¦ Æ                   >       -¡¦Æ,ÊS¡CEMU
        ¡ ¦ Æ                   >       -¡¦Æ,ÊS¡CA
        ¡ ¦ Æ                   >       -¡¦Æ,ÊS¡C¡
        ¡ ¦ Æ                   >       -¡¦Æ,ÊS¡CE
        ¡ ¦ Æ                   >       -¡¦Æ,ÊS¡CEJ

# nie¶æ
        [^J] E ¦ Æ              >       -E¦Æ,OS¡CY
        [^J] E ¦ Æ              >       -E¦Æ,OS¡CYM
        [^J] E ¦ Æ              >       -E¦Æ,OS¡CYMI
        [^J] E ¦ Æ              >       -E¦Æ,OS¡CYCH
        [^J] E ¦ Æ              >       -E¦Æ,OS¡CEGO
        [^J] E ¦ Æ              >       -E¦Æ,OS¡CEMU
        [^J] E ¦ Æ              >       -E¦Æ,OS¡CA
        [^J] E ¦ Æ              >       -E¦Æ,OS¡C¡
        [^J] E ¦ Æ              >       -E¦Æ,OS¡CE
        [^J] E ¦ Æ              >       -E¦Æ,OS¡CEJ

# bó¶æ
        Ó ¦ Æ                   >       -Ó¦Æ,OD¡CY
        Ó ¦ Æ                   >       -Ó¦Æ,OD¡CYM
        Ó ¦ Æ                   >       -Ó¦Æ,OD¡CYMI
        Ó ¦ Æ                   >       -Ó¦Æ,OD¡CYCH
        Ó ¦ Æ                   >       -Ó¦Æ,OD¡CEGO
        Ó ¦ Æ                   >       -Ó¦Æ,OD¡CEMU
        Ó ¦ Æ                   >       -Ó¦Æ,OD¡CA
        Ó ¦ Æ                   >       -Ó¦Æ,OD¡C¡
        Ó ¦ Æ                   >       -Ó¦Æ,OD¡CE
        Ó ¦ Æ                   >       -Ó¦Æ,OD¡CEJ

        [UY] Æ                  >       -Æ,J¡CY
        [UY] Æ                  >       -Æ,J¡CYM
        [UY] Æ                  >       -Æ,J¡CYMI
        [UY] Æ                  >       -Æ,J¡CYCH
        [UY] Æ                  >       -Æ,J¡CEGO
        [UY] Æ                  >       -Æ,J¡CEMU
        [UY] Æ                  >       -Æ,J¡CA
        [UY] Æ                  >       -Æ,J¡C¡
        [UY] Æ                  >       -Æ,J¡CE
        [UY] Æ                  >       -Æ,J¡CEJ

# k³uæ
        K £ U Æ                 >       -£UÆ,OL¡CY
        K £ U Æ                 >       -£UÆ,OL¡CYM
        K £ U Æ                 >       -£UÆ,OL¡CYMI
        K £ U Æ                 >       -£UÆ,OL¡CYCH
        K £ U Æ                 >       -£UÆ,OL¡CEGO
        K £ U Æ                 >       -£UÆ,OL¡CEMU
        K £ U Æ                 >       -£UÆ,OL¡CA
        K £ U Æ                 >       -£UÆ,OL¡C¡
        K £ U Æ                 >       -£UÆ,OL¡CE
        K £ U Æ                 >       -£UÆ,OL¡CEJ

        [^E] ¬ Æ                >       -¬Æ,Z¡CY
        [^E] ¬ Æ                >       -¬Æ,Z¡CYM
        [^E] ¬ Æ                >       -¬Æ,Z¡CYMI
        [^E] ¬ Æ                >       -¬Æ,Z¡CYCH
        [^E] ¬ Æ                >       -¬Æ,Z¡CEGO
        [^E] ¬ Æ                >       -¬Æ,Z¡CEMU
        [^E] ¬ Æ                >       -¬Æ,Z¡CA
        [^E] ¬ Æ                >       -¬Æ,Z¡C¡
        [^E] ¬ Æ                >       -¬Æ,Z¡CE
        [^E] ¬ Æ                >       -¬Æ,Z¡CEJ

        I E ¬ Æ                 >       -E¬Æ,OZ¡CY
        I E ¬ Æ                 >       -E¬Æ,OZ¡CYM
        I E ¬ Æ                 >       -E¬Æ,OZ¡CYMI
        I E ¬ Æ                 >       -E¬Æ,OZ¡CYCH
        I E ¬ Æ                 >       -E¬Æ,OZ¡CEGO
        I E ¬ Æ                 >       -E¬Æ,OZ¡CEMU
        I E ¬ Æ                 >       -E¬Æ,OZ¡CA
        I E ¬ Æ                 >       -E¬Æ,OZ¡C¡
        I E ¬ Æ                 >       -E¬Æ,OZ¡CE
        I E ¬ Æ                 >       -E¬Æ,OZ¡CEJ

#le¼æ
        L E ¬ Æ                 >       -¬Æ,Z¡CY
        L E ¬ Æ                 >       -¬Æ,Z¡CYM
        L E ¬ Æ                 >       -¬Æ,Z¡CYMI
        L E ¬ Æ                 >       -¬Æ,Z¡CYCH
        L E ¬ Æ                 >       -¬Æ,Z¡CEGO
        L E ¬ Æ                 >       -¬Æ,Z¡CEMU
        L E ¬ Æ                 >       -¬Æ,Z¡CA
        L E ¬ Æ                 >       -¬Æ,Z¡C¡
        L E ¬ Æ                 >       -¬Æ,Z¡CE
        L E ¬ Æ                 >       -¬Æ,Z¡CEJ
